cs: Fáze krmení prasat: Finišer; Růstové; Osev; Startér; Jiné
zh-CN: 猪饲料阶段: 后期; 生长期; 母猪; 幼畜; 其他
pt-PT: Fase de alimentação de porcos: Finalizador; Crescimento; Sementes; Iniciação; Outro
nl: Fase varkensvoer: Afmest; Groei; Zeug; Start; Andere
tr: Domuz besleme aşaması: Bitirme; Büyütücü; Tohumlama; Yavru; Diğer
nb: Grisefôrstadium: Slaktefôr; Kraftfôr; Purkefôr; Startfôr; Annet
hr-HR: Faza hranidbe svinja: U završnoj fazi tova; U rastu; Krmača; Početni rast; Ostalo
pl: Etap karmienia świń: Wykończenie; Plantator; Maciora; Przystawka; Inne
sk-SK: Životné štádium kŕmených ošípaných: Finišer; Pestovateľ; Zasiať; Štartér; Iné
lt-LT: Kiaulių pašaro ciklas: Nupenėtoms kiaulėms; Penėjimui; Paršavedėms; Startinis periodas; Kita
fr: Étape d’alimentation des porcs: Finisseur; Producteur; Semer; Démarreur; Autre
bg-BG: Етап на хранене на свине: Последна фаза; Захранване; Свиня майка; Начална фаза; Други
el: Στάδιο διατροφής χοίρων: Ολοκλήρωση της πάχυνσης; Απογαλακτισμένο κοτόπουλο; Χοιρομητέρα; Κοτόπουλο στο στάδιο έναρξης του παραγωγικού κύκλου; Άλλο
pt-BR: Estágio de alimentação de suínos: Para abate; Produtor; Semear; Inicial; Outro
de: Alter der zu fütternden Schweine: Fertiger; Erzeuger; Sau; Starter; Sonstiges
ru: Этап откорма свиней: Финишер; Молодняк; Свиноматка; Стартер; Другое
es: Etapa de alimentación de cerdos: Finalizador; Cultivador; Cerda; Iniciador; Otros
da: Svinefoderstadie: Efterbehandler; Avler; Så; Starter; Andet
ja: 段階別豚用飼料: フィニッシャー; グローワー; 雌豚; スターター; その他
en: Pig feed stage: Finisher; Grower; Sow; Starter; Other
vi: Giai đoạn cho lợn ăn: Vỗ béo; Choai; Lợn nái; Khởi động; Khác
sl-SI: Obdobje krme za prašiče: Finišer; Sesni; Svinja; Sesni; Drugo
sv: Grisfoderstadium: Avslutningsfoder; Tillväxtfoder; Sugga; Startfoder; Övrigt
zh-TW: 豬飼料發展時期: 肥育期; 生長期; 母豬; 保育期; 其他
fi: Sikojen rehukoroke: Viimeistelijä; Kasvattaja; Kylväntä; Aloittelu; Muu
hu: Sertéstakarmányozás szakasza: Befejező; Nevelő; Koca; Indító; Egyéb
ko: 돼지 사료 단계: 비육; 육성; 모돈; 자돈; 기타
it: Fase di alimentazione dei suini: Finissaggio; Grower; Sow; Starter; Altro
th: ระยะอาหารหมู: ไก่ใหญ่; ไก่รุ่น; สุกรแม่พันธุ์; ไก่เล็ก; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Etapa de hrănire a porcilor: Etapa de finisare; Etapa de creștere; Scroafă; Etapa de început; Altele